Hawaii statutes.
[§624D-3] Issuance of subpoena. (a) To
request issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party shall submit a
foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in the circuit in which discovery is sought
to be conducted in this State. A request for the issuance of a subpoena under
this chapter does not constitute an appearance in the courts of this State.

(b) When a party submits a foreign subpoena to
a clerk of court in this State, the clerk, in accordance with that court's
procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for service upon the person to which
the foreign subpoena is directed.

(c) A subpoena under subsection (b) shall:

(1) Incorporate the terms used in the foreign
subpoena; and

(2) Contain or be accompanied by the names,
addresses, and telephone numbers of all counsel of record in the proceeding to
which the subpoena relates and of any party not represented by counsel. [L
2012, c 17, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next